dev/infreq-apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="m/ale__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alar</l>
          <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alast</l>
          <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ala</l>
          <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ala</l>
          <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ala</l>
          <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ala</l>
          <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aler</l>
          <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ale</l>
          <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ale</l>
          <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ale</l>
          <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ali</l>
          <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alte</l>
          <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alt</l>
          <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ol</l>
          <r>ale<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/jåat__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ågst</l>
          <r>jåat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>est</l>
          <r>jåat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>est</l>
          <r>jåat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jåast</l>
          <r>jåat<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="h/ogge__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogde</l>
          <r>ogge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogd</l>
          <r>ogge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oggast</l>
          <r>ogge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ogga</l>
          <r>ogge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogger</l>
          <r>ogge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogge</l>
          <r>ogge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogge</l>
          <r>ogge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oggi</l>
          <r>ogge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogg</l>
          <r>ogge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øgg</l>
          <r>ogge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogg</l>
          <r>ogge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogt</l>
          <r>ogge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/ede__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edast</l>
          <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>eda</l>
          <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edd</l>
          <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
          <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
          <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edi</l>
          <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edt</l>
          <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tref/fas__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fas</l>
          <r>fas<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fes</l>
          <r>fas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>fas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r>fas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kv/elle__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ellast</l>
          <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ella</l>
          <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elle</l>
          <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olle</l>
          <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olli</l>
          <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ør/as__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>des</l>
          <r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="nibede"><i>nib</i><par n="b/ede__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kvelle"><i>kv</i><par n="kv/elle__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="naudbede"><i>naudb</i><par n="b/ede__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="steinhogge"><i>steinh</i><par n="h/ogge__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kanthogge"><i>kanth</i><par n="h/ogge__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="finhogge"><i>finh</i><par n="h/ogge__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="topphogge"><i>topph</i><par n="h/ogge__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tilbede"><i>tilb</i><par n="b/ede__vblex_adj"/></e>
